Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1665
Petit jury; extra jurors to complete jury panel; tales jurors.

(1) If for any reason it appears to the judge that the jury panel of petit jurors will not be adequate at any time during the jury term, the jury commissioner shall, when ordered by the judge, draw, in the same manner as the drawing of a regular jury panel under section 25-1656, such number of potential jurors as the judge directs to fill such jury panel or as extra jurors, and those drawn shall be notified and summoned in the same manner as described in section 25-1656 or as the court may direct. This shall also apply to the selection of tales jurors for particular causes after the regular jury panel is exhausted.

(2) Each person summoned under subsection (1) of this section shall forthwith appear before the court and if qualified shall serve on the jury panel unless such person is excused from service or lawfully challenged. If necessary, jurors shall continue to be so drawn from time to time until the jury panel is filled.

Laws 1915, c. 248, § 10, p. 572;

C.S.1922, § 9104;

C.S.1929, § 20-1634;

R.S.1943, § 25-1634;

Laws 1953, c. 72, § 13(1), p. 234;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 25-1634;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 22.